zh-TW: 電視專業功能: AI 驅動; 視角可調; 環境光感應器; 內建數位調諧器; 內建條形音箱; 支援 HDR; 網路電視; 局部調光; MEMC 技術; 動態插補技術; 降噪; 家長監護; 量子點技術; 螢幕鏡像; 智慧電視; 運動模式; 適用於遊戲; 支援 VESA 安裝; 語音控制; 其他
fi: Television erikoisominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Säädettävä katselukulma; Ympäristövalosensori; Sisäänrakennettu digitaalinen viritin; Sisäänrakennettu äänentoisto; HDR-tuki; Internet-TV; Paikallinen himmennys; MEMC-tekniikka; Liikeinterpolointitekniikka; Melun vähentäminen; Lapsilukko; Kvanttipistetekniikka; Näytön peilaus; Älytelevisio; Urheilutila; Soveltuu pelaamiseen; VESA-kiinnitys tuettu; Ääniohjaus; Muu
nl: Gespecialiseerde kenmerken televisie: AI-aangedreven; Instelbare kijkhoek; Omgevingslicht sensor; Ingebouwde digitale tuner; Ingebouwde geluidsbalk; HDR-ondersteuning; Internet-tv; Lokaal dimmen; MEMC-technologie; Interpolatietechnologie voor beweging; Ruisreductie; Ouderlijk toezicht; Quantum dot-technologie; Schermspiegeling; Slimme tv; Sportmodus; Geschikt voor gamen; VESA-montage ondersteuning; Spraakbesturing; Andere
fr: Fonctionnalités spécialisées de la télévision: Doté d’une IA; Angle de vision réglable; Capteur de lumière ambiante; Tuner numérique intégré; Barre de son intégrée; Prise en charge du HDR; Télévision par Internet; Local dimming; Technologie MEMC; Technologie d’interpolation de mouvement; Réduction de bruit; Contrôle parental; Technologie de points quantiques; Mise en miroir de l’écran; Smart TV; Mode sport; Adapté aux jeux; Support de montage VESA; Commande vocale; Autre
en: Television specialized features: AI-powered; Adjustable viewing angle; Ambient light sensor; Built-in digital tuner; Built-in soundbar; HDR support; Internet TV; Local dimming; MEMC technology; Motion interpolation technology; Noise reduction; Parental control; Quantum dot technology; Screen mirroring; Smart TV; Sports mode; Suitable for gaming; VESA mounting support; Voice control; Other
hu: Képernyő speciális jellemzői: AI-alapú; Állítható látószög; Környezeti fényérzékelő; Beépített digitális hangoló; Beépített hangsáv; HDR-támogatás; Internet TV; Helyi tompítás; MEMC technológia; Mozgásinterpolációs-technológia; Zajcsökkentés; Szülői felügyelet; Kvantumpont-technológia; Képernyőtükrözés; Okos TV; Sport mód; Játékra alkalmas; VESA rögzítési támogatás; Hangvezérlés; Egyéb
sk-SK: Špecializované funkcie televízie: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Nastaviteľný uhol pohľadu; Senzor okolitého svetla; Vstavaný digitálny tuner; Vstavaná zvuková lišta; Podpora HDR; Internetová televízia; Lokálne stmievanie; Technológia MEMC; Technológia pohybovej interpolácie; Zníženie hluku; Rodičovská kontrola; Technológia kvantových bodov; Zrkadlenie obrazovky; Smart TV; Športový režim; Vhodné na hranie; Montážna podpora VESA; Ovládanie hlasom; Iné
ru: Специализированные функции телевизора: На базе ИИ; Регулируемый угол обзора; Датчик освещенности; Встроенный цифровой тюнер; Встроенная звуковая панель; Поддержка HDR; Интернет-телевидение; Локальное затемнение; Технология MEMC; Технология интерполяции движения; Шумоподавление; Родительский контроль; Технология квантовых точек; Зеркальное отображение экрана; Смарт ТВ; Спортивный режим; Подходит для игр; Поддержка крепления VESA; Голосовое управление; Другое
da: Specialiserede funktioner for tv: AI-drevet; Justerbar synsvinkel; Omgivende lyssensor; Indbygget digital tuner; Indbygget soundbar; HDR-understøttelse; Internet TV; Lokal dæmpning; MEMC-teknologi; Bevægelsesinterpolationsteknologi; Støjreduktion; Forældrekontrol; Quantum dot-teknologi; Skærmspejling; Smart TV; Sportsmodus; Velegnet til gaming; VESA-montering understøttet; Stemmekontrol; Andet
pt-PT: Características especializadas de televisão: Alimentado por IA; Ângulo de visão ajustável; Sensor de luz ambiente; Sintonizador digital integrado; Sonar integrado; Suporte HDR; TV Internet; Escurecimento local; Tecnologia MEMC; Tecnologia de interpolação de movimento; Redução de ruído; Controlo parental; Tecnologia de pontos quânticos; Espelhamento de ecrã; Smart TV; Modo desportivo; Adequado para jogos; Suporte de montagem VESA; Controlo por voz; Outro
de: Spezielle Funktionen des Fernsehers: KI-gestützt; Einstellbarer Betrachtungswinkel; Umgebungslichtsensor; Eingebauter digitaler Tuner; Integrierte Soundbar; HDR-Unterstützung; Internet-TV; Lokales Dimmen; MEMC-Technologie; Motion-Interpolation; Lärmminderung; Kindersicherung; Quantenpunkttechnologie; Bildschirmspiegelung; Smart-TV; Sportmodus; Geeignet für Gaming; VESA-Montageunterstützung; Sprachsteuerung; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Caracteristici specializate ale televizorului: Pe bază de AI; Unghi de vizualizare reglabil; Senzor de lumină ambientală; Tuner digital încorporat; Bară de sunet integrată; Suport HDR; Televiziune prin internet; Reglare locală a intensității luminoase; Tehnologia MEMC; Tehnologia de interpolare a mișcării; Reducerea zgomotului; Control parental; Tehnologia punctului cuantic; Oglindirea ecranului; Smart TV; Mod sport; Potrivit pentru jocuri; Suport de montare VESA; Control vocal; Altele
vi: Tính năng chuyên dụng của TV: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Có thể điều chỉnh góc nhìn; Cảm biến ánh sáng xung quanh; Bộ điều chỉnh kỹ thuật số tích hợp; Loa thanh tích hợp; Hỗ trợ HDR; Truyền hình Internet; Làm mờ cục bộ; Công nghệ MEMC; Công nghệ nội suy chuyển động; Giảm ồn; Kiểm soát của cha mẹ; Công nghệ chấm lượng tử; Phản chiếu màn hình; TV thông minh; Chế độ thể thao; Thích hợp để chơi game; Hỗ trợ gắn VESA; Điều khiển bằng giọng nói; Khác
it: Funzionalità specializzate televisive: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Angolo di visione regolabile; Sensore di luce ambientale; Sintonizzatore digitale integrato; Soundbar integrata; Supporto HDR; Internet TV; Oscuramento locale; Tecnologia MEMC; Tecnologia di interpolazione del movimento; Riduzione del rumore; Parental control; Tecnologia dei punti quantici; Clonazione schermo; Smart TV; Modalità sportiva; Ideale per giocare; Supporto per montaggio VESA; Controllo vocale; Altro
hr-HR: Specijalizirane značajke televizora: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Podesivi kut gledanja; Senzor ambijentalnog svjetla; Ugrađeni digitalni tuner; Ugrađeni soundbar; Podrška za HDR; Internet TV; Lokalno zatamnjenje; MEMC tehnologija; Tehnologija interpolacije pokreta; Smanjenje buke; Roditeljska kontrola; Tehnologija kvantne točke; Zrcaljenje zaslona; Smart TV; Sportski način rada; Pogodno za gaming; VESA nosač za montažu; Glasovno upravljanje; Ostalo
ko: TV 특화 기능: AI 기반; 조절식 시야각; 앰비언트 광 센서; 내장 디지털 튜너; 내장 사운드바; HDR 지원; 인터넷 TV; 로컬 디밍; MEMC 기술; 모션 보간 기술; 소음 감소; 자녀 보호 기능; 퀀텀닷 기술; 화면 미러링; 스마트 TV; 스포츠 모드; 게임에 적합; VESA 장착 지원; 음성 제어; 기타
pl: Specjalistyczne funkcje telewizora: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Regulowany kąt patrzenia; Czujnik światła otoczenia; Wbudowany tuner cyfrowy; Wbudowana listwa głośnikowa; Obsługa HDR; Telewizja internetowa; Lokalne przyciemnienie; Technologia MEMC; Technologia interpolacji ruchu; Redukcja szumów; Kontrola rodzicielska; Technologia kropek kwantowych; Odbicie lustrzane na telewizorze; Smart TV; Tryb sportowy; Odpowiedni do gier; Wspornik montażowy VESA; Sterowanie głosowe; Inne
tr: Televizyona özel özellikler: Yapay zeka destekli; Ayarlanabilir görüş açısı; Ortam ışığı sensörü; Dahili dijital tuner; Dahili soundbar; HDR destekli; İnternet televizyonu; Yerel karartma; MEMC teknolojisi; Hareket enterpolasyonu teknolojisi; Gürültü azaltma; Ebeveyn denetimi; Kuantum nokta teknolojisi; Ekran yansıtma; Akıllı televizyon; Spor modu; Oyun oynamaya uygun; VESA montaj desteği; Ses kontrolü; Diğer
cs: Speciální vlastnosti televizoru: S umělou inteligencí; Nastavitelný úhel pohledu; Senzor okolního světla; Vestavěný digitální tuner; Vestavěný soundbar; Podpora HDR; Internetová televize; Lokální stmívání; Technologie MEMC; Technologie interpolace pohybu; Snížení hluku; Rodičovská kontrola; Technologie kvantových bodů; Zrcadlení obrazovky; Smart TV; Sportovní režim; Vhodné pro hraní her; Podpora montáže VESA; Hlasové ovládání; Jiné
th: คุณลักษณะพิเศษของโทรทัศน์: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; ปรับมุมมองได้; เซ็นเซอร์วัดแสง; จูนเนอร์ดิจิตอลในตัว; ซาวด์บาร์ในตัว; รองรับ HDR; อินเตอร์เน็ตทีวี; การหรี่แสงของหลอดเฉพาะบางจุด; เทคโนโลยี MEMC; เทคโนโลยีการแทรกเฟรมในภาพเคลื่อนไหว; การลดเสียงรบกวน; การควบคุมโดยผู้ปกครอง; เทคโนโลยีควอนตัมดอท; การสะท้อนหน้าจอ; สมาร์ททีวี; โหมดกีฬา; เหมาะสำหรับการเล่นเกม; รองรับระบบติดตั้งแบบ VESA; การควบคุมเสียง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Recursos especializados da televisão: Com IA; Ângulo de visão ajustável; Sensor de luz ambiente; Sintonizador digital integrado; Soundbar integrado; Suporte HDR; TV com internet; Escurecimento local; Tecnologia MEMC; Tecnologia de interpolação de movimento; Redução de ruído; Controle dos pais; Tecnologia de pontos quânticos; Espelhamento de tela; Smart TV; Modo esportes; Adequado para jogos; Suporte de montagem VESA; Controle de voz; Outro
sv: Detaljer för för tv: AI-driven; Justerbar betraktningsvinkel; Sensor för omgivande ljus; Inbyggd digital tuner; Inbyggt soundbar; HDR-stöd; Internet-TV; Lokal dimming; MEMC-teknik; Rörelseinterpolations-teknik; Brusreducering; Föräldrakontroll; Quantum dot-teknik; Skärmspegling; Smart TV; Sportläge; Lämplig för spel; VESA-montering stöds; Röststyrning; Övrigt
es: Características especializadas de la televisión: Con tecnología de IA; Ángulo de visión regulable; Sensor de luz ambiental; Sintonizador digital incorporado; Barra de sonido incorporada; Compatible con HDR; Televisión por Internet; Atenuación local; Tecnología MEMC; Tecnología de interpolación de movimiento; Reducción de ruido; Control parental; Tecnología de puntos cuánticos; Duplicación de pantalla; Televisor inteligente; Modo deportivo; Apto para juegos; Compatible con soporte VESA; Control por voz; Otros
zh-CN: 电视特色功能: AI 赋能; 可调视角; 环境光传感器; 内置数字调谐器; 内置条形音箱; 支持 HDR; 网络电视; 局部调光; MEMC 技术; 运动补偿技术; 降噪; 家长控制; 量子点技术; 屏幕镜像; 智能电视; 运动模式; 适合玩游戏; 支持安装 VESA; 语音控制; 其他
ja: テレビ専用機能: AI搭載; 視野角調整可能; 環境光センサー; 内蔵デジタルチューナー; 内蔵サウンドバー; HDR対応; インターネットテレビ; ローカルディミング; MEMC技術; モーション補間技術; ノイズ低減; ペアレンタルコントロール; 量子ドット技術; 画面ミラーリング; スマートテレビ; スポーツモード; ゲームに最適; VESAマウント対応; 音声コントロール; その他
lt-LT: Televizoriaus specialiosios funkcijos: Veikia DI pagrindu; Reguliuojamas žiūrėjimo kampas; Aplinkos šviesos jutiklis; Integruotas skaitmeninis imtuvas; Įmontuota garso sistema; HDR palaikymas; Internet TV; Vietinis pritemdymas; MEMC technologija; Judesio interpoliacijos technologija; Triukšmo slopinimas; Tėvų kontrolė; Kvantinių taškų technologija; Ekrano dubliavimas; Išmanioji televizija; Sportinis režimas; Tinka žaidimams; VESA tvirtinimo palaikymas; Valdymas balsu; Kita
nb: TV-spesialiserte funksjoner: KI-drevet; Regulerbar synsvinkel; Omgivelseslyssensor; Innebygd digital tuner; Innebygd lydplanke; HDR-støtte; Internett-TV; Lokal dimming; MEMC-teknologi; Bevegelsesinterpolasjonsteknologi; Støyreduksjon; Foreldrekontroll; Quantum dot-teknologi; Skjermspeiling; Smart-TV; Sportsmodus; Egnet for gaming; VESA-monteringstøtte; Talekontroll; Annet
el: Εξειδικευμένες δυνατότητες τηλεόρασης: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Ρυθμιζόμενη γωνία θέασης; Αισθητήρας φωτός περιβάλλοντος; Ενσωματωμένος ψηφιακός δέκτης; Ενσωματωμένη μπάρα ήχου; Υποστήριξη DVS; Internet TV; Τοπική εξασθένιση; Τεχνολογία MEMC; Τεχνολογία παρεμβολής κίνησης; Μείωση θορύβου; Γονικός έλεγχος; Τεχνολογία Quantum Dot; Κατοπτρισμός οθόνης; Smart TV; Αθλητική λειτουργία; Κατάλληλο για gaming; Υποστήριξη τοποθέτησης VESA; Φωνητικός έλεγχος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Специализирани телевизионни функции: Задвижван от AI; Регулируем ъгъл на гледане; Сензор за околна светлина; Вграден цифров тунер; Вграден саундбар; Поддръжка на HDR; Интернет телевизия; Локално затъмняване; Технология MEMC; Технология за интерполация на движението; Намаляване на шума; Родителски контрол; Технология на квантовите точки; Огледално отразяване на екрана; Smart TV; Спортен режим; Подходящ за игри; VESA опора за монтаж; Гласово управление; Други
sl-SI: Posebne funkcije televizije: Poganja UI; Nastavljiv vidni kot; Senzor zunanje svetlobe; Vgrajen digitalni uglaševalec; Vgrajena zvočna vrstica; HDR podpora; Internet TV; Lokalna zatemnitev; Tehnologija MEMC; Tehnologija interpolacije gibanja; Zmanjšanje hrupa; Starševski nadzor; Tehnologija kvantnih pik; Zrcaljenje zaslona; Pametna TV; Športni način; Primerno za igričarstvo; Podpora za montažo VESA; Glasovno upravljanje; Drugo